Louisiana, session 2026, HB81.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Civil Code Article 688.1 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
Art. 688.1. Removal of branches or roots of trees, bushes, or plants extending or
growing on neighboring property; penalties
A. If a neighbor does not trim the branches or roots of his trees, bushes, or
plants that extend over or into a landowner's property after a demand for removal has
been issued pursuant to Article 688, the landowner may have the branches or roots
trimmed by a licensed arborist following arboricultural standards, at the landowner's
own expense, if the landowner sends a thirty-day written notification to the neighbor
via certified mail or commercial courier with confirmation of delivery in accordance
with Paragraph (B) of this Article.
B. The written notification shall include the date, demand for removal, the
name and credentials of the licensed arborist who is to perform the removal, the
proposed date of the removal, and a statement that provides that if the neighbor does
not remove the branches or roots, the landowner shall proceed with removal after
thirty days from the delivery of the written notification. The credentials of the
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-352 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 81
licensed arborist shall include an arborist license in addition to general liability
insurance and workers' compensation insurance.
C. Nothing in this Article shall preclude a landowner from removing the
branches or roots of trees, bushes, or plants that extend into the landowner's property
himself, without notification, if the removal is conducted in a reasonable manner and
does not cause material damage to the health of the tree, bush, or plant.